Massachusetts, session 194th, H4758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. This Act may be known as the MassMakers Act. For purposes of this Act, 
2 the following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires 
3 otherwise:  
4  “Marketplace facilitator” and “remote retailer” shall have the meanings set forth in 830 
5 CMR 64H.1.9, or any successor regulation.   
6  “Massachusetts Downtown Initiative”, the Massachusetts Downtown Initiative 
7 established pursuant to Section XXXX of this Act, for the purpose of protecting, coordinating, 
8 promoting, and revitalizing downtowns and commercial districts of the commonwealth’s cities 
9 and towns.  
10  “MassMade business”, an enterprise which (i) has its principal place of business in the 
11 commonwealth; (ii) is in good standing with the department of revenue; (iii) is registered with 
12 Supply Mass/Buy Mass, as defined in this Act; and (iv) produces raw materials, including 

2 of 21 13 agricultural items, in the commonwealth, or manufactures products or goods in the 
14 commonwealth.  
15  “MassMakers Portal”, the one-stop shop interactive web portal established pursuant to 
16 Section 3 of this Act for prospective and established businesses in the commonwealth, to serve as 
17 the single, unified entry point for business information and statutory and regulatory compliance.  
18  “Massport Model”, the bidder selection model implemented by the port authority which, 
19 in the port authority’s requests for proposals, requires bidders to incorporate diversity and 
20 inclusion plans into their bids, such plans to be considered alongside traditional criteria when 
21 evaluating bids and given a weight of 25%.  
22  “Microbusiness”, an enterprise which has its principal place of business in the 
23 commonwealth, is independently owned and operated, and (i) if a manufacturing firm, has 25 or 
24 fewer employees, or (ii) if a service, construction or non-manufacturing firm, has 25 or fewer 
25 employees and average annual gross receipts over the 3 previous years not exceeding 
26 $3,500,000, indexed for inflation.  
27  “Minority business”, an enterprise which has its principal place of business in the 
28 commonwealth, is independently owned and operated, and at least 51% of which is owned and 
29 dominantly controlled by adult minority principals as defined in 425 CMR 2.02(1), or any 
30 successor regulation thereto.  
31  “Online sales” shall mean sales of tangible personal property or taxable services for 
32 which the order is placed by electronic means and shipped or delivered to a location in the 
33 commonwealth, including sales made by marketplace facilitators on behalf of third-party sellers.   

3 of 21 34  “Physical point-of-sale transactions” shall mean sales at a retail location in the 
35 commonwealth where the purchaser takes possession at the time of sale.  
36  “Small business”, a business entity, including its affiliates, that: (i) is independently 
37 owned and operated; (ii) has a principal place of business in the commonwealth; and (iii) would 
38 be defined as a ''small business'' under applicable federal law, as established in the United States 
39 Code and promulgated from time to time by the United States Small Business Administration.  
40  “Supply Mass/Buy Mass”, the program established pursuant to Section 4 of this Act for 
41 the purpose of connecting local suppliers with local purchasers.  
42  “Massachusetts-based business”, an enterprise that: (i) has its principal place of business 
43 in the commonwealth; (ii) is in good standing with the department of revenue; and (iii) has been 
44 in business for at least 1 year.”  
45  SECTION 2. Section 22O of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
46 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
47  When procuring goods or services through requests for proposals, state agencies shall 
48 consider the bidder’s principal place of business in addition to other criteria when evaluating 
49 bids. The weight given to Massachusetts-based businesses when evaluating bids shall be 
50 determined by each agency of the commonwealth in collaboration with the executive office of 
51 housing and economic development, the executive office of labor and workforce development 
52 and the executive office for administration and finance.  
53  SECTION 3. Chapter 9 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 
54 31 the following section:-  

4 of 21 55  Section 32: MassMakers Portal  
56  Section 32. (a) There is hereby established a one-stop shop interactive web portal to be 
57 known as the MassMakers Portal for prospective and established businesses in the 
58 commonwealth. The state secretary, the executive office for administration and finance, the 
59 executive offices of education, energy and environmental affairs, health and human services, 
60 housing and economic development, labor and workforce development, public safety and 
61 security, and technology services and security, and the department of revenue shall jointly 
62 develop and implement the MassMakers Portal, which shall serve as a single, unified entry point 
63 for prospective and established businesses to obtain local business information and execute all 
64 statutory and regulatory compliance tasks required by the commonwealth in connection with the 
65 creation, continuing operation, or upscaling of business.  
66  (b) In order to develop and implement the MassMakers Portal, the agencies identified in 
67 subsection (a) shall assemble a task force which shall consist of the state secretary, ex officio, or 
68 a designee, the secretaries of administration and finance, education, energy and environmental 
69 affairs, health and human services, housing and economic development, labor and workforce 
70 development, public safety and security, and technology services and security, ex officio, or their 
71 designees, the commissioner of revenue, ex officio, or a designee; 7 persons appointed by the 
72 attorney general, 1 of whom shall be from each of the 7 regions of the commonwealth: the 
73 western region, the central region, the northeast region, the Merrimack Valley, the metro west 
74 region, the Greater Boston region, and the southeast region; and 7 persons appointed by the 
75 governor, 1 of whom shall be from each of the 7 identified regions of the commonwealth. The 
76 governor, attorney general, state treasurer, and co-chairs of the task force shall have the 
77 discretion to appoint other members to the task force by majority vote. Persons appointed to the 

5 of 21 78 task force shall be members or representatives of the business community, including 
79 entrepreneurs, microbusiness owners, minority business owners and small business owners, 
80 and/or have demonstrated interests and experience in state agency processes, business 
81 regulations, web portal design and implementation, and/or other qualifications and experience 
82 that the appointing authorities determine are necessary to fulfilling the mission of the task force. 
83 Members shall be selected without regard to political affiliation, shall as fully as possible 
84 represent a diverse and equitable array of stakeholders, and shall serve without compensation. 
85 The state secretary, or a designee from among the members of the task force, and the secretary of 
86 housing and economic development, or a designee from among the members of the task force, 
87 shall serve as co-chairs.  
88  (c) The task force shall perform a needs and cost assessment and may, subject to 
89 appropriation and the laws and regulations pertaining to the employment of consultants, employ 
90 such consultants as the task force deems necessary to assist in the execution of said assessment. 
91 Said assessment shall be completed and the results thereof shall be presented to the governor and 
92 the general court by March 1, 2025, to inform the budget of the next legislative annual session. 
93 The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, the following:  
94  (1) recommendations on the location, design, functionality and scope of services of the 
95 MassMakers Portal, which at a minimum shall include:  
96  (i) online account services through which businesses can monitor deadlines for 
97 submission of forms, documents and payments, as well as compliance status and standing with 
98 each state agency;  
99  (ii) electronic applications for licenses and renewals thereof;  

6 of 21 100  (iii) electronic payment options for fees and taxes incident to the creation, continuing 
101 operation or upscaling of business;  
102  (iv) compliance alerts in connection with new or revised state statutes, regulations and 
103 procedures;  
104  (v) toolkits and video tutorials on all aspects of starting a business in the commonwealth, 
105 operating a business, upscaling a business, completing forms and complying with state statutory 
106 and regulatory requirements in connection therewith;  
107  (vi) Supply Mass/Buy Mass information, and coordination with Supply Mass/Buy Mass 
108 online services;  
109  (vii) Mass Main Streets information, and coordination with Mass Main Streets online 
110 services;  
111  and  
112  (viii) technical assistance resources;  
113  (2) an estimate of the costs of full implementation of the MassMakers Portal, including, 
114 but not limited to, those associated with technology, infrastructure, operations and maintenance, 
115 sharing and coordination of agency data, and security;  
116  (3) recommendations for and an estimate of the costs of establishing and maintaining a 
117 help center staffed with persons trained to answer questions and assist with navigation of the 
118 MassMakers Portal;  

7 of 21 119  (4) recommendations on the time-line for designing, developing and testing the 
120 MassMakers Portal, which at the latest shall have its first testing phase for the state secretary’s 
121 office to process new business registrations and associated fee payments by December 31, 2024 , 
122 and shall have its second testing phase to submit tax payments with the department of revenue by 
123 December 31, 2025 ;  
124  (5) recommendations as to the roles of the agencies identified in subsection (a) regarding 
125 ongoing operational management of the MassMakers Portal;  
126  (6) a comprehensive analysis of the processes of all state agencies with respect to the 
127 creation, continued operation or upscaling of businesses located in the commonwealth, with a 
128 goal of simplifying and streamlining regulatory tasks and forms required by said agencies and 
129 strengthening the delivery of services provided by said agencies to entrepreneurs, 
130 microbusinesses, small businesses, and other businesses in the commonwealth;  
131  (7) identification of any state statutory, regulatory or procedural changes that need to be 
132 made to effectuate the functionality of the MassMakers Portal;  
133  (8) identification of existing entrepreneurial, microbusiness, small business, and other 
134 business assets, resources, web content and functions provided by state agencies to coordinate 
135 and incorporate such assets, resources, web content and functions into the MassMakers Portal;  
136  (9) identification of potential impediments to functionality posed by federal law, if any, 
137 and recommendations for work-arounds or solutions to such impediments;  
138  (10) the impact of prioritizing microbusiness applications and account services; and  

8 of 21 139  (11) recommendations on potential incentives to encourage municipalities or regional 
140 planning authorities to create local portals for similar purposes or committed to similar mission 
141 outcomes as the MassMakers Portal, with the option of linking to or being incorporated into the 
142 MassMakers Portal.  
143  (d) The task force may, subject to appropriation, appoint and may remove all such 
144 employees as may be necessary to carry out the work of designing and implementing the 
145 MassMakers Portal based on the results of the needs and cost assessment. Unless otherwise 
146 provided by law, all such appointments and removals of employees shall be made under chapter 
147 31.  
148  (e) The state secretary shall hold as a separate fund and may expend such sums as may be 
149 appropriated for the MassMakers Portal by the general court, and may accept gifts, donations, 
150 grants or bequests or any federal funds for any of the purposes set forth in this section, which 
151 shall be credited to the fund. All available money in the fund that is unexpended at the end of 
152 each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure by the 
153 task force in the subsequent fiscal year.  
154  (f) The state secretary is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations to assure the timely 
155 and effective implementation of this section.   
156  SECTION 4. Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
157 10A and inserting the following section:-  
158  Section 10A: Supply Mass/Buy Mass; MassMade  

9 of 21 159  Section 10A. (a) In order for the commonwealth to execute on its responsibility of 
160 facilitating expansion of the local economy, MOBD shall establish a program to be known as 
161 Supply Mass/Buy Mass for the purpose of connecting local suppliers with local purchasers, 
162 whether public or private, institutional, commercial or individual. In implementing said program, 
163 MOBD shall:  
164  (1) establish requirements for local suppliers to register as MassMade businesses with 
165 Supply Mass/Buy Mass;  
166  (2) design and implement a Supply Mass/Buy Mass interactive web portal through which 
167 local suppliers can register as MassMade businesses and create MassMade business profiles with 
168 industry-specific information;  
169  (3) assemble a searchable database of MassMade businesses through the portal by 
170 industry, raw materials produced or products or goods manufactured, and other identifying 
171 characteristics, with specific search features independently tailored toward local institutional 
172 purchasers, commercial purchasers, and individual purchasers;  
173  (4) develop toolkits and training videos available through the portal to guide MassMade 
174 businesses to better understand the needs and procurement processes of local institutional and 
175 commercial purchasers;  
176  (5) enable local institutional and commercial purchasers to issue requests for proposals 
177 through the portal and MassMade businesses to respond to such requests through the portal;  
178  (6) promote live networking events through the portal to connect MassMade businesses 
179 with local institutional and commercial purchasers;  

10 of 21 180  (7) determine those raw materials, products or goods needed by local institutional and 
181 commercial purchasers currently purchased outside the commonwealth or from foreign 
182 countries, especially raw materials, products or goods required for the first time; inquire whether 
183 other local institutional or commercial purchasers are in need of such raw materials, products or 
184 goods; assess whether any MassMade businesses are capable of producing or manufacturing the 
185 needed raw materials, products or goods with additional capital or retooling;  
186  (8) coordinate and connect the portal with the MassMakers Portal;  
187  (9) identify other obstacles to conducting business in the commonwealth and advance 
188 resources through the portal to address those obstacles to the extent possible;  
189  (10) promote public-private partnerships;  
190  (11) develop, evaluate and recommend policies, initiatives and incentives to prevent 
191 consumer flight from local suppliers in the cities and towns of the Merrimack Valley and other 
192 border municipalities to suppliers in New Hampshire or other tax advantaged states or from other 
193 sources; and  
194  (12) undertake any other activities necessary to implement the purposes of this section.  
195  Dedicated effort shall be made to encourage diversity and advance equity based on race, 
196 color, religious creed, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, genetic 
197 information, ancestry, disability, and language in implementing Supply Mass/Buy Mass.  
198  (b) MOBD may consult with and seek input from interested stakeholders and shall work 
199 with entities including MassMade businesses, regional economic development organizations, 
200 microbusiness and small business associations, chambers of commerce, the supplier diversity 

11 of 21 201 office, the Massachusetts marketing partnership and the office of consumer affairs and business 
202 regulations in order to collect and provide business and product information related to 
203 MassMade businesses. All Supply Mass/Buy Mass information shall be readily accessible and 
204 free to the public.  
205  (c) MOBD shall hold as a separate fund and may expend such sums as may be 
206 appropriated for Supply Mass/Buy Mass by the general court, and may accept gifts, donations, 
207 grants or bequests or any federal funds for any of the purposes set forth in this section, which 
208 shall be credited to the fund. All available money in the fund that is unexpended at the end of 
209 each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure by 
210 MOBD for Supply Mass/Buy Mass in the subsequent fiscal year.  
211  (d) MOBD is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations to assure the timely and 
212 effective implementation of this section.  
213  SECTION 5. Chapter 23A of the 2020 Official Edition of the General Laws is hereby 
214 amended after section 13 by inserting the following new section:-  
215  131/2. Massachusetts Downtown Initiative  
216  Within the Office of Business Development, there shall be established the Massachusetts 
217 Downtown Initiative. The Massachusetts Downtown Initiative shall serve as the principal agency 
218 for promoting and protecting the downtown and commercial districts of the commonwealth’s 
219 cities and towns.   
220  (a) The executive director of the Massachusetts Downtown Initiative shall be appointed 
221 by the governor, and serve at the pleasure of the governor. The position of executive director of 

12 of 21 222 MDI shall be classified under section 45 of chapter 30 and the executive director of MDI shall 
223 devote full time during business hours to the duties of MDI.  
224  (b) The executive director of MDI may, subject to appropriation and with the approval of 
225 MOBD, appoint and may, with like approval, remove all such employees as may be necessary to 
226 carry out the work of MDI. Unless otherwise provided by law, all such appointments and 
227 removals shall be made under chapter 31. The executive director may, subject to appropriation 
228 and the laws and regulations pertaining to the employment of consultants, employ such 
229 consultants as the executive director may deem necessary.  
230  (c) MDI may accept and solicit funds, including any gifts, donations, grants or bequests 
231 or any federal funds for any of the purposes set forth in this section, which shall be credited to 
232 the Downtown Vitality Fund established pursuant to Chapter 10, Section 35TTT of the 
233 Massachusetts General Laws.  
234  (d) MDI shall submit an annual report to MOBD, the clerks of the senate and house of 
235 representatives and the joint committee on community development and small businesses not 
236 later than December 31 on the cost-effectiveness of the fund. The report shall be made available 
237 on the MDI website. The report shall include: (i) expenditures made by MDI from money out of 
238 the fund to promote the revitalization of downtowns and commercial districts of the 
239 commonwealth’s cities and towns and to otherwise fulfill the mission of MDI pursuant to this 
240 section; and (ii) expenditures made by MDI for administrative costs.  
241  SECTION 6. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
242 is hereby amended by inserting after section 35SSS, the following new section:     
243  Section 35TTT. Downtown Vitality Fund   

13 of 21 244  (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context requires 
245 otherwise, have the following meanings:-     
246  “Agency”, the Executive Office of Housing and Economic Development.     
247  “Commercial areas”, meaning central business districts, town centers, commercial 
248 corridors (“Main Streets”), neighborhood-serving commercial districts, and other walkable, 
249 mixed-use areas.    
250  “District management entities”, which may include business improvement districts as 
251 defined in section 1 of chapter 40o of the general laws, parking benefit districts as defined in 
252 section 22A1/2 of chapter 40 of the general laws, cultural districts as defined in section 58A of 
253 chapter 10 of the general laws, or other district management strategies approved by the agency.    
254  “Secretary”, the Secretary of Economic Development.    
255  ''Fund'', the Downtown Vitality Fund, established under subsection (b) of section 35QQQ 
256 of chapter 10 of the general laws.     
257  ''Dedicated remote retailers sales tax revenue amount'', all moneys received by the 
258 commonwealth equal to 1 per cent of the receipts from sales from remote retailers, which include 
259 both remote marketplace sellers and remote marketplace facilitators as defined by 830 CMR 
260 64H.1.9.  
261  (b) There is hereby established on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund to be 
262 known as the Downtown Vitality Fund. There shall be credited to the fund 1% of the the 
263 “dedicated remote retailers sales tax revenue amount”. Annual receipts into the fund on account 

14 of 21 264 of any fiscal year shall be considered to meet the full obligation of the commonwealth to the 
265 fund for said fiscal year.    
266  (c) Amounts in the fund shall be held by the Executive Office of Economic Development, 
267 exclusively for the purposes of the fund, and the agency shall disburse amounts in the fund, 
268 without further appropriation, upon the request from time to time of its Secretary. All amounts in 
269 the fund, including investment earnings, shall be available for expenditure by the agency for any 
270 lawful purpose.  The Fund shall be administered by the Massachusetts Downtown Initiative 
271 within EOED along with line item 7002-8075  and other technical assistance funds allocated to 
272 the office.   
273  (d) The agency shall report annually on grants dispersed by the fund to the clerks of the 
274 house and senate and to the house and senate committees on ways and means.     
275  (e) The agency shall make expenditures from the fund for the following purposes and 
276 subject to the following guidelines:     
277  (1) To provide grants to establish district management entities in commercial areas.     
278  (2) To provide operating grants to help strengthen and sustain existing district 
279 management entities approved by the agency.    
280  (3) To provide technical assistance grants for local district management entities to 
281 conduct studies or launch new programs, and which might be paid to a third-party entity.   
282  (4) To provide multi-year grants to communities participating in the Transformative 
283 Development Initiative (TDI) program, to be administered by the Massachusetts Development 
284 Finance Agency (“MassDevelopment”).   

15 of 21 285  (5) To provide direct grants to municipalities or municipally endorsed third parties to 
286 implement local economic development plans, small business plans, rapid response plans, or 
287 other such plans intended to strengthen local commercial areas.   
288  (6) The agency will establish guidelines for awarding grants, which will incorporate the 
289 following priorities: support small business districts in Gateway Cities and other low-income 
290 areas; expand entrepreneurship opportunities among underrepresented communities; strengthen 
291 cultural identity and prevent cultural displacement; and require a local match set at a level 
292 commensurate with the strength of the local market economy.     
293  (f) Not later than September 1 of each year, the secretary shall file a report in writing with 
294 the joint committee on community development and small businesses and the house and senate 
295 committees on ways and means concerning the grants made in the fiscal year ending on the 
296 preceding June 30.     
297  (g) There shall be established a board to be known as the Downtown Vitality Advisory 
298 Board. Said board shall consist of at least 15 members, who shall be citizens of the 
299 commonwealth, and appointed by the secretary.  The members of the board shall include at least 
300 one representative of the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency (MassDevelopment); at 
301 least one representative of the Massachusetts Cultural Council; at least two business 
302 improvement districts; at least two cultural districts; at least one Gateway City mayor, manager, 
303 or economic development director; at least one non-Gateway City municipal representative; and 
304 at least three members of small business representatives serving underrepresented communities, 
305 including immigrants and people of color. The Secretary shall appoint members for terms no 
306 longer than three years. Members shall serve without compensation. The board shall advise the 

16 of 21 307 director on the activities and uses of the fund including, but not limited to: reviewing and making 
308 recommendations on grant requirements and selection criteria, and reviewing grant applications 
309 and making recommendations relative to grant awards. The advisory board shall, from time to 
310 time, submit recommendations to the legislature on any legislative changes it deems necessary 
311 for the successful operation of the fund.  
312  SECTION 7. Section 1 of chapter 40O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
313 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Management entity” the 
314 following definition:-  
315  “Participating property owner”, any property owner who is not exempted from payment 
316 of BID fees and who shall be counted for purposes of establishing the petition threshold and 
317 meeting the signatory requirements.  
318  SECTION 8. The second paragraph of section 3 of said chapter 40O, as so appearing, is 
319 hereby amended by striking out clause (5) and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-  
320  (5) the criteria for exempting the fee for any class of property owners within the BID 
321 district, and the procedure, if any, for waiving the annual fee of an individual participating 
322 property owner who can provide evidence that the imposition of such fee would create a 
323 significant financial hardship.  
324  SECTION 9. Section 4 of said chapter 40O is hereby amended by striking out the sixth 
325 paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-  
326  Participation in the BID shall be permanent until after the discontinuation of the BID as 
327 provided in this section, or until the dissolution of the BID under section 10. A non-participating 

17 of 21 328 owner in the district shall become a participating member on the date of a renewal vote, as 
329 provided below. On or before the fifth anniversary of the organization of a newly created BID, 
330 the board of directors of the BID or of its designated management entity shall call a renewal 
331 meeting of the BID members to review the preceding 5–year history of the BID, to propose an 
332 updated improvement plan to succeed the then current improvement plan and to consider 
333 whether to continue the BID. The renewal meeting shall be held at a location within the district. 
334 Notice of the meeting shall be given to participating members in the manner provided in the by-
335 laws, at least 30 days prior to the meeting. The BID shall continue if a majority of participating 
336 property owners who are not more than 30 days in arrears in any payment due to the BID and are 
337 present at the renewal meeting, in person or by proxy, vote to renew the BID commencing on the 
338 first day of the next fiscal year of the BID. Thereafter, the board of directors of the BID may opt 
339 for a renewal term of up to 10 years and shall follow all procedures for a renewal meeting 
340 heretofore described.  
341  SECTION 10. Section 7 of said chapter 40O, is hereby amended by striking out the third 
342 paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-  
343  The BID, through its improvement plan, shall have the option to limit or cap the 
344 maximum annual fee derived from individual properties or the total annual revenue generated by 
345 the BID; the BID may also establish a minimum fee threshold, below which property owners are 
346 exempted from paying the fee.  
347  SECTION 11. Said section 7 of said chapter 40O is hereby further amended by inserting 
348 after the third paragraph the following paragraph:-  

18 of 21 349  The initial management plan may also propose a “phase-in” period of not more than 3 
350 years, with assessments increasing over the stated period. The formula for determining the 
351 district fee structure shall be set forth in the original petition as required by section 3.  
352  SECTION 12. Section 8 of said Chapter 40O is hereby amended by striking out the fifth 
353 paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-  
354  The BID corporation shall comply with the public charity reporting requirements of 
355 section 8F of chapter 12. A copy shall be made available for the public to access in the town or 
356 city offices or on the municipal website.  
357  SECTION 13. Section 22A of chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
358 inserting, in paragraph 1, line 28, after the phrase “improvements to the public realm” the 
359 following words: “including district management activities and operations”  
360  SECTION 14. Section 22C of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
361 inserting, in line 11, after the phrase, “public transportation station accessibility improvements” 
362 the following words: “district management activities and operations,”.  
363  SECTION 15. Section 82 of Chapter 62C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
364 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:–  
365  (f) (1) The department shall, to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with 
366 section 21, collect, maintain, and publish summary data that differentiates sales and use tax 
367 collections under chapters 64H and 64I by channel, including, at a minimum:  
368  (i) collections attributable to marketplace facilitators;  
369  (ii) collections attributable to remote retailers other than marketplace facilitators;  

19 of 21 370  (iii) collections attributable to in-state vendors from physical point-of-sale transactions; 
371 and  
372  (iv) consumer use tax remitted directly by purchasers.  
373  (2) The department shall include this breakdown in its monthly revenue reports and its 
374 annual report, provided that no report shall disclose information that could identify a specific 
375 taxpayer. The commissioner may publish additional methodological notes, data dictionaries and 
376 revisions as necessary to ensure consistent reporting over time. The department shall implement 
377 the data collection and reporting required by this paragraph not later than January 1, 2026, and 
378 shall publish the first monthly report reflecting such breakdown not later than February 15, 2026, 
379 for the collections month of January 2026.  
380  SECTION 16.  
381  (a) There shall be a special commission to study how artificial intelligence and other 
382 emerging technologies can be used to support the enforcement activities of the department of 
383 revenue, with particular focus on sales and use tax compliance for online and marketplace 
384 transactions. The commission shall examine, without limitation: (i) data, tools and methods to 
385 detect non-filers and under-remitters among remote sellers and marketplace facilitators; (ii) 
386 techniques to distinguish online transactions from point-of-sale transactions occurring at physical 
387 locations within the commonwealth; (iii) approaches to improve audit selection, case 
388 prioritization and collections; (iv) safeguards to protect taxpayer confidentiality and reduce 
389 disparate impact or bias in automated systems; and (v) staffing, training, procurement and 
390 governance needs to responsibly deploy such technologies.  

20 of 21 391  (b) The commission shall consist of the following members or their designees: the 
392 commissioner of revenue, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of administration and finance; 
393 the state comptroller; the secretary of technology services and security; the attorney general; the 
394 state auditor; and 6 additional members appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a 
395 representative of the Massachusetts Taxpayers Foundation, 1 of whom shall have expertise in 
396 data privacy or civil liberties, and 2 of whom shall have expertise in artificial intelligence or data 
397 science. Members shall serve without compensation.  
398  (c) To support the work of the commission, the commissioner of revenue may, 
399 notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, enter into memoranda of 
400 understanding with up to 2 public or private universities with demonstrated expertise in artificial 
401 intelligence, data science, public finance, or tax administration to serve as research partners to 
402 the commission. Such partners may provide research, data engineering, modeling, and evaluation 
403 support. Any access to confidential taxpayer information by a university partner shall be subject 
404 to chapter 62C, section 21, and to written agreements that (i) restrict use and redisclosure; (ii) 
405 require secure handling and destruction; and (iii) provide for penalties consistent with said 
406 section 21.  
407  (d) The commission shall file with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, 
408 the joint committee on revenue, and the house and senate committees on ways and means an 
409 interim report not later than September 1, 2026, and a final report not later than July 1, 2027, 
410 containing its findings and recommendations, including any drafts of legislation necessary to 
411 carry out its recommendations.  

21 of 21 412  (e) The commission shall dissolve 120 days after filing its final report, unless extended 
413 by joint resolution.